Connecticut, session 2026, SB00459.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Subsection (d) of section 9-404b of the general statutes is
2 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
3 passage):
4 (d) Each circulator of a primary petition page shall be an enrolled
5 party member of a municipality in this state. Each petition page shall
6 contain a statement signed by the registrar of the municipality in which
7 the circulator is an enrolled party member attesting that the circulator is
8 an enrolled party member in the municipality. Unless such a statement
9 by the registrar of voters appears on each page so submitted, the
10 Secretary shall reject the page. Each separate page of the petition shall
11 contain a statement as to the authenticity of the signatures on the page
12 and the number of such signatures, and shall be signed under the
13 penalties of false statement by the person who circulated the page,
14 setting forth the circulator's address and the town in which the
15 circulator is an enrolled party member and attesting that each person
16 whose name appears on the page signed the petition in person in the
17 presence of the circulator, that the circulator either knows each such
LCO 1 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 459
18 signer or that the signer satisfactorily identified himself or herself to the
19 circulator and that the spaces for candidates supported, offices sought
20 and the political party involved were filled in prior to the obtaining of
21 the signatures. Each separate page of the petition shall also be
22 acknowledged before an appropriate person as provided in section 1-
23 29. The Secretary shall reject any page of a petition filed with the
24 Secretary which does not contain such a statement by the circulator as
25 to the authenticity of the signatures on the page, or upon which the
26 statement of the circulator is incomplete in any respect, or which does
27 not contain the certification required under this section by the registrar
28 of the town in which the circulator is an enrolled party member. No
29 person who has been convicted of a crime under this title shall circulate
30 any page of a primary petition during such person's period of probation
31 or parole, and for a period of twelve years after such person's release
32 from confinement, probation or parole, and the Secretary shall reject for
33 filing any such page that was circulated in violation of such prohibition.
34 For the purpose of complying with such rejection requirement, the
35 Secretary shall order the performance of a nation-wide criminal
36 background check on each circulator of one or more primary petition
37 pages. Any individual proposed as a candidate in any primary petition
38 may serve as a circulator of the pages of the petition, provided the
39 individual's service as circulator does not violate any provision of this
40 section.
41 Sec. 2. Subsection (c) of section 9-410 of the general statutes is
42 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from
43 passage):
44 (c) Each circulator of a primary petition page shall be an enrolled
45 party member of a municipality in this state who is entitled to vote. Each
46 petition page shall contain a statement signed by the registrar of the
47 municipality in which such circulator is an enrolled party member
48 attesting that the circulator is an enrolled party member in such
49 municipality. Unless such a statement by the registrar appears on each
50 page so submitted, the registrar shall reject such page. No candidate for
51 the nomination of a party for a municipal office or the position of town
LCO 2 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 459
52 committee member shall circulate any petition for another candidate or
53 another group of candidates contained in one primary petition for the
54 nomination of such party for the same office or position, and any
55 petition page circulated in violation of this provision shall be rejected by
56 the registrar. No person shall circulate petitions for more than the
57 maximum number of candidates to be nominated by a party for the
58 same office or position, and any petition page circulated in violation of
59 this provision shall be rejected by the registrar. Each separate sheet of
60 such petition shall contain a statement as to the authenticity of the
61 signatures thereon and the number of such signatures, and shall be
62 signed under the penalties of false statement by the person who
63 circulated the same, setting forth such circulator's address and the town
64 in which such circulator is an enrolled party member and attesting that
65 each person whose name appears on such sheet signed the same in
66 person in the presence of such circulator, that the circulator either knows
67 each such signer or that the signer satisfactorily identified the signer to
68 the circulator and that the spaces for candidates supported, offices or
69 positions sought and the political party involved were filled in prior to
70 the obtaining of the signatures. Each separate sheet of such petition shall
71 also be acknowledged before an appropriate person as provided in
72 section 1-29. Any sheet of a petition filed with the registrar which does
73 not contain such a statement by the circulator as to the authenticity of
74 the signatures thereon, or upon which the statement of the circulator is
75 incomplete in any respect, or which does not contain the certification
76 hereinbefore required by the registrar of the town in which the
77 circulator is an enrolled party member, shall be rejected by the registrar.
78 No person who has been convicted of a crime under this title shall
79 circulate any page of a primary petition during such person's period of
80 probation or parole, and for a period of twelve years after such person's
81 release from confinement, probation or parole, and the registrar shall
82 reject for filing any such page that was circulated in violation of such
83 prohibition. For the purpose of complying with such rejection
84 requirement, the registrar shall order the performance of a nation-wide
85 criminal background check on each circulator of one or more primary
86 petition pages. Any individual proposed as a candidate in any primary
LCO 3 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 459
87 petition may serve as a circulator of the pages of such petition, provided
88 such individual's service as circulator does not violate any provision of
89 this section.
90 Sec. 3. Section 9-453e of the general statutes is repealed and the
91 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
92 (a) Each circulator of a nominating petition page shall be a United
93 States citizen, at least eighteen years of age and a resident of a town in
94 this state and shall not be on parole for conviction of a felony. Any
95 individual proposed as a candidate in any nominating petition may
96 serve as circulator of the pages of such nominating petition.
97 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) of this section,
98 no person who has been convicted of a crime under this title shall
99 circulate any page of a nominating petition during such person's period
100 of probation or parole, and for a period of twelve years after such
101 person's release from confinement, probation or parole. The appropriate
102 town clerk or the Secretary of the State, as applicable under section 9-
103 453i, shall reject for filing any such page that was circulated in violation
104 of such prohibition. For the purpose of complying with such rejection
105 requirement, the appropriate town clerk or the Secretary, as applicable,
106 shall order the performance of a nation-wide criminal background
107 check on each circulator of one or more nominating petition pages.
108 Sec. 4. Section 9-453j of the general statutes is repealed and the
109 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
110 Each page of a nominating petition submitted to the town clerk or the
111 Secretary of the State and filed with the Secretary of the State under the
112 provisions of sections 9-453a to 9-453s, inclusive, or section 9-216 shall
113 contain a statement as to the residency in this state and eligibility of the
114 circulator and authenticity of the signatures thereon, signed under
115 penalties of false statement, by the person who circulated the same. Such
116 statement shall set forth (1) such circulator's residence address,
117 including the town in this state in which such circulator is a resident, (2)
118 the circulator's date of birth and that the circulator is at least eighteen
LCO 4 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 459
119 years of age, (3) that the circulator is a United States citizen and [not]
120 neither (A) on parole for conviction of a felony, nor (B) on probation or
121 parole for conviction of a crime under this title or within the period that
122 is twelve years after release from confinement, probation or parole due
123 to conviction of a crime under this title, and (4) that each person whose
124 name appears on such page signed the same in person in the presence
125 of such circulator and that either the circulator knows each such signer
126 or that the signer satisfactorily identified himself to the circulator. Any
127 false statement committed with respect to such statement shall be
128 deemed to have been committed in the town in which the petition was
129 circulated.
130 Sec. 5. Subsections (j) to (o), inclusive, of section 9-140 of the 2026
131 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
132 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective from passage):
133 (j) No person shall pay or give any compensation to another, and no
134 person shall accept any compensation, solely for (1) [distributing
135 absentee ballot applications obtained from a municipal clerk or the
136 Secretary of the State or (2)] obtaining an absentee ballot application
137 from a municipal clerk, as the designee of an absentee ballot applicant,
138 (2) obtaining fewer than five absentee ballot applications for the purpose
139 of distributing such applications to members of such person's
140 immediate family, pursuant to subparagraph (C) of subdivision (1) of
141 subsection (k) of this section, or (3) assisting any other person in the
142 execution of an absentee ballot application.
143 (k) (1) [A person shall register with the municipal clerk before
144 distributing five or more absentee ballot applications for an election,
145 primary or referendum, not including applications distributed to such
146 person's immediate family. Such requirement shall not apply to] No
147 person shall receive any absentee ballot application for the purpose of
148 distributing such application to another person, except for (A) a person
149 who is the designee of an applicant, [or to] (B) any employee of the
150 Department of Correction who provides the application for absentee
151 ballot form prescribed under subsection (c) of section 9-139a to one or
LCO 5 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 459
152 more incarcerated absentee ballot applicants, and (C) a person who
153 receives fewer than five absentee ballot applications for the purpose of
154 distributing such applications to members of such person's immediate
155 family.
156 (2) The municipal clerk shall reject the application of any absentee
157 ballot applicant made upon the form prescribed under subsection (c) of
158 section 9-139a if such form indicates any address other than an address
159 at a Department of Correction facility. The municipal clerk shall
160 maintain a log of all applications of incarcerated absentee ballot
161 applicants received by such municipal clerk, which log shall indicate the
162 name and address of each applicant, the date of receipt of each
163 application and the date such municipal clerk mailed the absentee ballot
164 to such applicant or the reason why such application was rejected.
165 [(3) Any person who distributes absentee ballot applications shall
166 maintain a list of the names and addresses of prospective absentee ballot
167 applicants who receive such applications, and shall file such list with
168 the municipal clerk prior to the date of the primary, election or
169 referendum for which the applications were so distributed, except that
170 such requirements shall not apply to any employee of the Department
171 of Correction who provides the application for absentee ballot form
172 prescribed under subsection (c) of section 9-139a to incarcerated
173 absentee ballot applicants. Any person who distributes absentee ballot
174 applications and receives an executed application shall forthwith file the
175 application with the municipal clerk.]
176 (l) No candidate, party or political committee, or agent of such
177 candidate or committee, shall mail unsolicited applications for absentee
178 ballots to any person. [, unless such mailing includes: (1) A written
179 explanation of the eligibility requirements for voting by absentee ballot
180 as prescribed in subsection (a) of section 9-135, and (2) a written warning
181 that voting or attempting to vote by absentee ballot without meeting one
182 or more of such eligibility requirements subjects the elector or applicant
183 to potential civil and criminal penalties.] As used in this subsection,
184 "agent" means any person authorized to act on behalf of another person.
LCO 6 of 7

Substitute Bill No. 459
185 (m) The Secretary of the State shall conspicuously post on the
186 Secretary of the State's web site, adjacent to the absentee ballot
187 application form available for downloading, a notice that the
188 application may be downloaded by a person only for (1) the person's
189 own use, (2) the use of a member of the person's immediate family, or
190 (3) the use of a designee of the applicant. The notice shall also contain
191 an advisory statement concerning the requirements of subsection (k) of
192 this section.
193 (n) The State Elections Enforcement Commission, in consultation
194 with the Secretary of the State, shall prepare a summary of the
195 requirements and prohibitions of the absentee voting laws, which shall
196 be posted on said agencies' web sites. Candidates and political party
197 chairpersons shall provide such summary to campaign and party
198 employees and volunteers.
199 (o) As used in this section, (1) "immediate family" has the same
200 meaning as provided in subsection (a) of section 9-140b, and (2)
201 "designee" has the same meaning as provided in subsection (b) of
202 section 9-140b.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 from passage 9-404b(d)
Sec. 2 from passage 9-410(c)
Sec. 3 from passage 9-453e
Sec. 4 from passage 9-453j
Sec. 5 from passage 9-140(j) to (o)
Statement of Legislative Commissioners:
In Section 4(3)(B), "within twelve years of release" was changed to
"within the period that is twelve years after release" and "due to such a
conviction under this subparagraph" was changed to "due to conviction
of a crime under this title", for clarity and consistency.
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 7 of 7